New York, session 2025-2026, S3060.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 87 of the transportation corporations law is 2 amended to read as follows: 3 § 87. Construction through villages, towns and cities. No new pipe 4 line shall be constructed into or through any incorporated village, town 5 or city in this state, unless authorized by a resolution prescribing the 6 route, manner of construction and terms upon which granted, adopted at a 7 regular meeting of the board of trustees of the village, town board, or 8 the legislative body of the city by a two-thirds vote thereof, but such 9 resolution shall not affect any private right. No pavement shall be 10 removed in any city under the provisions of this article, except as 11 directed by the legislative body, nor until the corporation seeking to 12 remove the same shall give a bond in such sum as the legislative body 13 may require for relaying of any pavements removed. In case any pavement 14 shall have been removed and not properly relaid, the city may sue such 15 corporation, for the cost of relaying such pavement. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05136-01-5